Hawaii statutes.
[§269-15.6] Alternative dispute resolution.
The commission may require the parties in any matter before the commission to
participate in nonbinding arbitration, mediation, or other alternative dispute
resolution process prior to the hearing. [L 2000, c 263, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next